Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department is tasked with generating greater local capacity. To achieve this objective, the department may advance funds to public benefit nonprofit corporations, as defined in RCW 24.03A.245, that have received grants from the department. This advance funding pilot program will provide advance funds, as described in this section, to eligible grant recipients who have demonstrated the need for advance funding in order to perform the work required by the department grant.(2) The department shall develop uniform equity-driven procedures for the demonstration of need. The department shall consult with external partners, including impacted communities, to develop the procedures.(3) The department shall develop eligibility criteria for advance fund applicants. The department shall prioritize those applicants with an average annual budget less than $5,000,000. The eligibility criteria must include:(a) The recipient must have been awarded a department grant within six months;(b) The recipient must have performed satisfactorily under any grant received from the department within the preceding 10 years;(c) The recipient must be a public benefit nonprofit corporation, as defined in RCW 24.03A.245;(d) The recipient must have been in the business for which the grant was received for a minimum of three years; and(e) The grant received from the department must be to protect public health, protect public safety, promote public welfare, or provide a benefit to the state.(4) Advance fund payments are to be one time and limited to no more than 25 percent of the grant or $100,000, whichever is less. The amount of the advance fund payment must be deducted from the total grant awarded to the recipient.(5) An enforceable contract that protects the interests of the state must be fully executed before any advance fund payments are made. The advance fund recipient shall use the awarded funds only for the purpose stated in the contract.(6) By September 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature and the governor in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 that includes:(a) An evaluation of the advance funding pilot program that includes outcome data for participants;(b) Recommendation whether to continue the advance funding program; and(c) Recommendations for improving or expanding the advance funding program.(7) This section expires June 30, 2028.Sec. 2. RCW 39.34.150 and 2011 c 336 s 805 are each amended to read as follows:(1) State agencies are authorized to advance funds to defray charges for materials to be furnished or services to be rendered by other state agencies. Such advances shall be made only upon the approval of the director of financial management, or his or her order made pursuant to an appropriate regulation requiring advances in certain cases. An advance shall be made from the fund or appropriation available for the procuring of such services or materials, to the state agency which is to perform the services or furnish the materials, in an amount no greater than the estimated charges therefor.(2) Until June 30, 2028, the department of commerce may advance funds to public benefit nonprofit corporations, as defined in RCW 24.03A.245, pursuant to an approved contract under section 1 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---